Utah statutes.
31A-22-1402.   Definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply in this part:

(1)  "Applicant" means:

(a)  in the case of an individual long-term care insurance policy, the person who seeks to contract for benefits; and

(b)  in the case of a group long-term care insurance policy, the proposed certificate holder.

(2)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-1-301,"certificate" means a certificate issued under a group long-term care insurance policy if the group long-term care insurance policy is delivered or issued for delivery in this state.

(3)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-1-301, "policy" means a policy, contract subscriber agreement, rider, or endorsement, if the policy, contract subscriber agreement, rider, or endorsement is delivered or issued:

(a)  in this state; and

(b)  by:

(i)  an insurer;

(ii)  a fraternal benefit society;

(iii)  a nonprofit health, hospital, or medical service corporation;

(iv)  a prepaid health plan;

(v)  a health maintenance organization; or

(vi)  an entity similar to an entity described in Subsections (3)(b)(i) through (v).



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

